Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1014
Local regulation; authorized.

Any city, village, or county may adopt and promulgate rules, regulations, and ordinances which are not inconsistent with the provisions of sections 28-1008 to 28-1017, 28-1019, and 28-1020 for the protection of the public, public health, and animals within its jurisdiction.

Laws 1990, LB 50, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 273, § 7;

Laws 2008, LB764, § 8;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB494, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB360, § 7.